Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4909
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of the Managing General Agents Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 120.